New York, session 2025-2026, A9060.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 6527 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 555 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 7. A licensed physician may prescribe and order a patient specific 5 order or non-patient specific regimen to a licensed pharmacist, pursuant 6 to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, and consistent with the 7 public health law, for: (a) administering immunizations to prevent 8 influenza to patients two years of age or older; and (b) administering 9 immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis A, 10 hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicella, 11 COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease and 12 medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis to patients 13 eighteen years of age or older; and (c) administering other immuniza- 14 tions [recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices 15 of the centers for disease control and prevention] in accordance with 16 regulations issued by the commissioner of health, utilizing generally 17 accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommendations EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13697-09-6 A. 9060--C 2 1 of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family 2 Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the 3 American College of Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization 4 practices, any interstate body established for purposes of reviewing and 5 making recommendations regarding immunization coverage and access, or 6 other similar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organ- 7 izations, for patients eighteen years of age or older if the commission- 8 er of health in consultation with the commissioner determines that an 9 immunization: (i) (A) may be safely administered by a licensed pharma- 10 cist within their lawful scope of practice; and (B) is needed to prevent 11 the transmission of a reportable communicable disease that is prevalent 12 in New York state; or (ii) is a recommended immunization for such 13 patients who: (A) meet age requirements, (B) lack documentation of such 14 immunization, (C) lack evidence of past infection, or (D) have an addi- 15 tional risk factor or another indication [as recommended by the advisory 16 committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease control 17 and prevention] in accordance with regulations issued by the commission- 18 er of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking 19 into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of Pedia- 20 trics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American College 21 of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, 22 the advisory committee on immunization practices, any interstate body 23 established for purposes of reviewing and making recommendations regard- 24 ing immunization coverage and access, or other similar nationally or 25 internationally recognized scientific organizations. Nothing in this 26 subdivision shall authorize unlicensed persons to administer immuniza- 27 tions, vaccines or other drugs. 28 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 6801 of the education 29 law, as amended by section 1 of part DD of chapter 57 of the laws of 30 2018, is amended to read as follows: 31 (e) administer the immunization or immunizations [according to the 32 most current recommendations by the advisory committee for immunization 33 practices (ACIP),] in accordance with regulations issued by the commis- 34 sioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards and 35 taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of 36 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 37 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 38 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 39 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- 40 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 41 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations, 42 provided however, that a pharmacist may administer any immunization 43 authorized under this section when specified by a patient specific 44 order. 45 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 6801 of the education 46 law, as amended by section 1 of part DD of chapter 57 of the laws of 47 2018, is amended to read as follows: 48 a. a clearly visible posting of the most current "Recommended Adult 49 Immunization Schedule" [published by the advisory committee for immuni- 50 zation practices (ACIP)] in accordance with regulations issued by the 51 commissioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards 52 and taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of 53 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 54 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 55 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 56 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- A. 9060--C 3 1 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 2 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations; and 3 § 4. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph a of subdivision 22 of section 6802 4 of the education law, as amended by chapter 802 of the laws of 2022, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 (1) the direct application of an immunizing agent to adults, whether 7 by injection, ingestion, inhalation or any other means, pursuant to a 8 patient specific order or non-patient specific regimen prescribed or 9 ordered by a physician or certified nurse practitioner, for: immuniza- 10 tions to prevent influenza, pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis 11 A, hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicel- 12 la, COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease 13 and medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis; and 14 other immunizations [recommended by the advisory committee on immuniza- 15 tion practices of the centers for disease control and prevention] in 16 accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner of health, 17 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 18 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 19 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 20 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the advisory 21 committee on immunization practices, any interstate body established for 22 purposes of reviewing and making recommendations regarding immunization 23 coverage and access, or other similar nationally or internationally 24 recognized scientific organizations for patients eighteen years of age 25 or older if the commissioner of health in consultation with the commis- 26 sioner determines that an immunization: (i)(A) may be safely adminis- 27 tered by a licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of practice; 28 and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission of a reportable communica- 29 ble disease that is prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a recom- 30 mended immunization for such patients who: (A) meet age requirements, 31 (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) lack evidence of past 32 infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor or another indication 33 [as recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices of 34 the centers for disease control and prevention] in accordance with regu- 35 lations issued by the commissioner of health, utilizing generally 36 accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommendations 37 of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family 38 Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the 39 American College of Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization 40 practices, any interstate body established for purposes of reviewing and 41 making recommendations regarding immunization coverage and access, or 42 other similar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organ- 43 izations. If the commissioner of health determines that there is an 44 outbreak of disease, or that there is the imminent threat of an outbreak 45 of disease, then the commissioner of health may issue a non-patient 46 specific regimen applicable statewide. 47 § 5. Subdivision 7 of section 6909 of the education law, as amended by 48 chapter 555 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 49 7. A certified nurse practitioner may prescribe and order a patient 50 specific order or non-patient specific regimen to a licensed pharmacist, 51 pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, and consistent 52 with the public health law, for: (a) administering immunizations to 53 prevent influenza to patients two years of age or older; and (b) admin- 54 istering immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, 55 hepatitis A, hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, 56 varicella, COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis A. 9060--C 4 1 disease and medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis 2 to patients eighteen years of age or older; and (c) administering other 3 immunizations [recommended by the advisory committee on immunization 4 practices of the centers for disease control and prevention] in accord- 5 ance with regulations issued by the commissioner of health, utilizing 6 generally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration 7 recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American 8 Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and 9 Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the advisory commit- 10 tee on immunization practices, any interstate body established for 11 purposes of reviewing and making recommendations regarding immunization 12 coverage and access, or other similar nationally or internationally 13 recognized scientific organizations for patients eighteen years of age 14 or older if the commissioner of health in consultation with the commis- 15 sioner determines that an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely adminis- 16 tered by a licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of practice; 17 and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission of a reportable communica- 18 ble disease that is prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a recom- 19 mended immunization for such patients who: (A) meet age requirements, 20 (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) lack evidence of past 21 infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor or another indication 22 [as recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices of 23 the centers for disease control and prevention] in accordance with regu- 24 lations issued by the commissioner of health, utilizing generally 25 accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommendations 26 of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family 27 Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the 28 American College of Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization 29 practices, any interstate body established for purposes of reviewing and 30 making recommendations regarding immunization coverage and access, or 31 other similar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organ- 32 izations. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize unlicensed 33 persons to administer immunizations, vaccines or other drugs. 34 § 6. Item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph 17 of subsection (i) 35 of section 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the 36 laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 37 (ii) immunizations [that have in effect a recommendation from the 38 advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 39 control and prevention] in accordance with regulations issued by the 40 commissioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards 41 and taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of 42 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 43 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 44 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 45 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- 46 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 47 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations, with 48 respect to the individual involved; 49 § 7. Item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph 8 of subsection (l) of 50 section 3221 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the laws 51 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 52 (ii) immunizations [that have in effect a recommendation from the 53 advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 54 control and prevention] in accordance with regulations issued by the 55 commissioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards 56 and taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of A. 9060--C 5 1 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 2 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 3 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 4 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- 5 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 6 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations, with 7 respect to the individual involved; 8 § 8. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 3 of subsection (j) of section 4303 9 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 219 of the laws of 2011, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 (B) immunizations [that have in effect a recommendation from the advi- 12 sory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 13 control and prevention] in accordance with regulations issued by the 14 commissioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards 15 and taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of 16 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 17 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 18 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 19 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- 20 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 21 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations, with 22 respect to the individual involved; 23 § 9. Item (ii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph 4 of subsection (b) of 24 section 4322 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 219 of the laws 25 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 26 (ii) immunizations [that have in effect a recommendation from the 27 advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 28 control and prevention] in accordance with regulations issued by the 29 commissioner of health, utilizing generally accepted medical standards 30 and taking into consideration recommendations of the American Academy of 31 Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American 32 College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American College of 33 Physicians, the advisory committee on immunization practices, any inter- 34 state body established for purposes of reviewing and making recommenda- 35 tions regarding immunization coverage and access, or other similar 36 nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations, with 37 respect to the individual involved; 38 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately.